en: Katsuobushi, Katsuo bushi, Kezuri Bushi
fr: Katsuobushi, Katsuo bushi, Kezuri Bushi

en: Maruboshi
fr: Maruboshi

en: Fermented rices
fr: Riz fermenté

en: Seaweeds and their products, Seaweed, Algae
de: Algen
es: Algas y sus productos, Algas
fi: Merilevät ja merilevätuotteet
fr: Algues et dérivés, Algues
he: אצות ומוצריהן, אצות, אצה, אלגאה
hr: Morske alge i njihovi proizvodi
it: Alghe e derivati
ja: 藻類
nl: Algen
pl: Algi, Glony

en: Canned seaweeds, Tinned algae
de: Eingemachte Algen, Algenkonserven
es: Algas en conserva
fr: Algues en conserve
hr: Konzervirane alge
nl: Algen in blik/pot

en: Seaweed spreads, Seaweed spread, seaweed tartar, algae tartar
fr: Tartares d'algues, Tartare d'algues
hr: Namazi od morske trave
nl: Zee-algenpasta

en: Dried seaweeds, Dried seaweed
de: Getrocknetes Seegras
es: Algas deshidratadas, Algas secas
fi: Kuivatut merilevät, Kuivattu merilevä
fr: Algues sèches
hr: Sušene morske trave
it: Alghe secche
nl: Gedroogde algen
pl: Algi suszone, Glony suszone

en: Fresh seaweeds
es: Algas frescas
fr: Algues fraîches
hr: Svježe morske alge
nl: Verse algen

en: Ground dried seaweeds, Dried seaweeds powders
es: Algas secas molidas, Algas secas en polvo, Algas deshidratadas molidas, Algas deshidratadas en polvo
fr: Algues sèches moulues
hr: Mljevene sušene morske trave
nl: Gedroogde gemalen algen

en: Arame seaweeds, Arame
es: Algas arame, Arame
fr: Algues aramé, Aramé
hr: Arame morske trave
it: Alghe marine Arame
ja: アラメ
la: Eisenia bicyclis
nl: Arames

en: Dried arame seaweed
es: Algas arame deshidratadas
fr: Algues aramé sèches
hr: Sušene alge arame
it: Alghe arame essiccate
nl: Gedroogde Arame

en: Gracilaria seaweeds
fr: Gracilaire, ogonori
hr: Gracilaria alge
la: Gracilaria verrucosa

en: Dried gracilaria seaweeds, Dehydrated gracilaria seaweeds
fr: Gracilaire séchée, déshydratée, ogonori séché, ogonori déshydraté

en: Toothed wrack, bladder wrack, Fucus serratus, Fucus vesiculosus
fr: Fucus vésiculeux, Fucus serratus, Fucus vesiculosus

en: dried Toothed wrack, dried bladder wrack, dried Fucus serratus, dried Fucus vesiculosus, dehydrated Toothed wrack, dehydrated bladder wrack, dehydrated Fucus serratus, dehydrated Fucus vesiculosus
fr: Fucus vésiculeux séché, Fucus serratus séché, Fucus vesiculosus séché, Fucus vésiculeux déshydraté, Fucus serratus déshydraté, Fucus vesiculosus déshydraté

en: Cochayuyo seaweeds, Cochayuyo
es: Algas cochayuyo, Cochayuyo
fr: Algues cochayuyo, Cochayuyo
hr: Cochayuyo morske trave
la: Durvillaea antarctica
nl: Durvillaea antarctica algen

en: Dried cochayuyo seaweeds
es: Algas cochayuyo deshidratadas
fr: Algues cochayuyo sèches
hr: Sušene alge cochayuyo
nl: Gedroogde Durvillaea antarctica algen

en: Dulse seaweeds, Dulse, Dillisk, Dilsk
es: Algas dulse, Dulse
fr: Algues dulse, Dulse, Goémon à vache, Algue à vache
hr: Dulse morske alge
la: Palmaria palmata
nl: Dulse, Rode dulse, Dillisk

en: Dried dulse seaweeds
es: Algas dulse deshidratadas
fr: Algues dulse sèches
hr: Sušene dulse morske trave
nl: Gedroogde dulse algen

en: Dulse seaweed powders, Ground dried dulse seaweeds
es: Algas dulse en polvo, Algas dulse deshidratadas en polvo
hr: Dulse morske alge u prahu
nl: Gedroogde dulse algenpoeders